test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xara_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - хараха: #

    хараха+V+FutPrc: хараха

    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: хараб
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: харыш
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: хара
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: харабди
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: харыт
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: хара

    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: хараб
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: хара
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: хара
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: хараб
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: хара
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: хара

    хараха+V+PrfPrc: XXX
    хараха+V+Imprt+Sg2: XXX
    хараха+V+Imprt+Pl2: XXX
    хараха+V+Opt+Sg1: хараһууб
    хараха+V+Opt+Pl1: хараһуубди
    хараха+V+Vol+Sg1: хараяа
    хараха+V+Vol+Pl1: хараябди

    хараха+V+FutPrc+Sg1: харахаб
    хараха+V+FutPrc+Sg2: харахыш
    хараха+V+FutPrc+Sg3: хараха
    хараха+V+FutPrc+Pl1: харахабди
    хараха+V+FutPrc+Pl2: харахыт
    хараха+V+FutPrc+Pl3: хараха

    хараха+V+ImpfPrc+Sg1: харааб
    хараха+V+ImpfPrc+Sg2: харааыш
    хараха+V+ImpfPrc+Sg3: хараа
    хараха+V+ImpfPrc+Pl1: хараабди
    хараха+V+ImpfPrc+Pl2: харааыт
    хараха+V+ImpfPrc+Pl3: хараа

    хараха+V+HabPrc+Sg1: харадагб
    хараха+V+HabPrc+Sg2: харадагыш
    хараха+V+HabPrc+Sg3: харадаг
    хараха+V+HabPrc+Pl1: харадагбди
    хараха+V+HabPrc+Pl2: харадагыт
    хараха+V+HabPrc+Pl3: харадаг

    хараха+V+AgPrc+Sg1: харагшаб
    хараха+V+AgPrc+Sg2: харагшыш
    хараха+V+AgPrc+Sg3: харагша
    хараха+V+AgPrc+Pl1: харагшабди
    хараха+V+AgPrc+Pl2: харагшыт
    хараха+V+AgPrc+Pl3: харагша

    хараха+V+AgConstPrc+Sg1: хараашаб
    хараха+V+AgConstPrc+Sg2: хараашыш
    хараха+V+AgConstPrc+Sg3: харааша
    хараха+V+AgConstPrc+Pl1: хараашабди
    хараха+V+AgConstPrc+Pl2: хараашыт
    хараха+V+AgConstPrc+Pl3: харааша

    хараха+V+PerfPrc+Sg1: хараһанб
    хараха+V+PerfPrc+Sg2: хараһаныш
    хараха+V+PerfPrc+Sg3: хараһан
    хараха+V+PerfPrc+Pl1: хараһанбди
    хараха+V+PerfPrc+Pl2: хараһаныт
    хараха+V+PerfPrc+Pl3: хараһан

    хараха+V+PotPrc+Sg1: харахаарб
    хараха+V+PotPrc+Sg2: харахаарыш
    хараха+V+PotPrc+Sg3: харахаар
    хараха+V+PotPrc+Pl1: харахаарбди
    хараха+V+PotPrc+Pl2: харахаарыт
    хараха+V+PotPrc+Pl3: харахаар

    хараха+V+DualPrc+Sg1: харамаарб
    хараха+V+DualPrc+Sg2: харамаарыш
    хараха+V+DualPrc+Sg3: харамаар
    хараха+V+DualPrc+Pl1: харамаарбди
    хараха+V+DualPrc+Pl2: харамаарыт
    хараха+V+DualPrc+Pl3: харамаар

    хараха+V+PassPrc+Sg1: хараатайб
    хараха+V+PassPrc+Sg2: хараатайыш
    хараха+V+PassPrc+Sg3: хараатай
    хараха+V+PassPrc+Pl1: хараатайбди
    хараха+V+PassPrc+Pl2: хараатайыт
    хараха+V+PassPrc+Pl3: хараатай

    хараха+V+ResPrc+Sg1: харанхайб
    хараха+V+ResPrc+Sg2: харанхайыш
    хараха+V+ResPrc+Sg3: харанхай
    хараха+V+ResPrc+Pl1: харанхайбди
    хараха+V+ResPrc+Pl2: харанхайыт
    хараха+V+ResPrc+Pl3: харанхай

    хараха+V+ConMod: харан
    хараха+V+ConImpf: хаража
    хараха+V+ConPrf: хараад
    хараха+V+ConCond: харабал
    хараха+V+ConConc: харабашье
    хараха+V+ConTerm: харатар
    хараха+V+ConCntmp: харамсаар
    хараха+V+ConAbtmp: хараһаар
    хараха+V+ConFin: харахаар
    хараха+V+ConIntnt: харахаяа
    хараха+V+ConSucc: харахалаар
    хараха+V+ConCmp: харанхаар

    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Dur+Sg1: харанаб
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Dur+Sg2: хараныш
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Dur+Sg3: харана
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Dur+Pl1: харанабди
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Dur+Pl2: хараныт
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Dur+Pl3: харана

    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Derm+Sg1: харабаб
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Derm+Sg2: харабыш
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Derm+Sg3: хараба
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Derm+Pl1: харабабди
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Derm+Pl2: харабыт
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Derm+Pl3: хараба

    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Conf+Sg1: харалайб
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Conf+Sg2: харалайыш
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Conf+Sg3: харалай
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Conf+Pl1: харалайбди
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Conf+Pl2: харалайыт
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Conf+Pl3: харалай
